Utah statutes.
34A-1-202.   Divisions and office -- Creation -- Duties -- Labor Relations Board, Appeals Board, councils, and panels.

(1)  There is created within the commission the following divisions and office:

(a)  the Division of Industrial Accidents that shall administer the regulatory requirements of this title concerning industrial accidents and occupational disease;

(b)  the Division of Occupational Safety and Health that shall administer the regulatory requirements of Chapter 6, Utah Occupational Safety and Health Act;

(c)  the Division of Boiler and Elevator Safety that shall administer the regulatory requirements of Chapter 7, Safety;

(d)  the Division of Antidiscrimination and Labor that shall administer the regulatory requirements of:

(i)  Title 34, Labor in General, when specified by statute;

(ii)  Chapter 5, Utah Antidiscrimination Act;

(iii) this title, when specified by statute; and

(iv)  Title 57, Chapter 21, Utah Fair Housing Act;

(e)  the Division of Adjudication that shall adjudicate claims or actions brought under this title; and

(f)  the Utah Office of Coal Mine Safety created in Section 40-2-201.

(2)  In addition to the divisions created under this section, within the commission are the following:

(a)  the Labor Relations Board created in Section 34-20-3;

(b)  the Appeals Board created in Section 34A-1-205;

(c)  the following program advisory councils:

(i)  the workers' compensation advisory council created in Section 34A-2-107;

(ii)  the antidiscrimination and labor advisory council created in Section 34A-5-105;

(iii)  the occupational safety and health advisory council created in Section 34A-6-106; 

(iv)  the Mine Safety Technical Advisory Council created in Section 40-2-203; and

(v)  the Coal Miner Certification Panel created in Section 40-2-204.

(3)  In addition to the responsibilities described in this section, the commissioner may assign to a division a responsibility granted to the commission by law.



Amended by Chapter 174, 2009 General Session

